Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.206

Source of milk and milk products—Seller's disclosure.

Any person selling milk or milk products shall furnish the director, upon request, with the name of all milk processing plants or distributors from whom their milk and milk products are obtained.

[ 1999 c 291 s 13.]